Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 30.5
INTERDEPARTMENTAL AGREEMENTS TO CONSOLIDATE
PAROLE AND PROBATION OFFICES

17-30.5-101. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article repealed, p. 849, § 49, effective May 24.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1991. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2000, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.